Nebraska, session 109, LB55.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB55 LB55
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate
$1,500,000 for FY2025-26 from the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access
Assessment Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services for the
medical assistance program to provide reimbursement to mental health
providers who do not practice in a hospital and who provide services to
medicaid-eligible participants who are eligible for both medicaid and
medicare, if there is a lower rate paid under medicare compared to rates
paid at the time for medicaid rates for behavioral health services.
It is the intent of the Legislature to sustain the medicaid rates
for mental health providers serving medicaid-eligible participants who
are eligible for both medicaid and medicare and are receiving behavioral
health services under Program 348, Medical Assistance.
-2-